nb: Type streng: Bunnstreng; Kryss-streng; Tilpasset strenging (arbeid); Målvaktstreng; Nettingsett; Nettingdel; Runner; Skytestreng; Sideveggstreng; Strengesett; Toppstreng; Annet
lt-LT: Lakroso virvelės tipas: Apatinis raištis; Skersinis raištis (Crosslace); Pasirinktinis suvarstymo darbas; Vartininko raištis; Tinklelio rinkinys; Tinklelio dalis; Ilgasis raištis (Runner); Metimo raištis; Šoninis raištis; Raiščių rinkinys; Viršutinis raištis; Kita
en: Lacrosse string type: Bottom string; Crosslace; Custom stringing labor; Goalie string; Mesh kit; Mesh piece; Runner; Shooting string; Sidewall string; String kit; Top string; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta vrvice za lakros: Spodnja vrvica; Prečna vrvica; Izdelava napetja po meri; Vratarska vrvica; Komplet za mrežo; Kos mreže; Vodilna vrvica; Strelska vrvica; Stranska vrvica; Komplet vrvic; Zgornja vrvica; Drugo
tr: Lakros ip türü: Alt ip; Çapraz ip; Özel ip dizme işçiliği; Kaleci ipi; Ağ kiti; Ağ parçası; Şerit; Atış ipi; Yan duvar ipi; İp kiti; Üst ip; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ výpletu na lakros: Spodná šnúra; Krížová šnúra; Vlastné vypletanie; Brankárska šnúra; Súprava so sieťovinou; Kus sieťoviny; Vodiaca šnúra (runner); Strelecká šnúra; Bočná šnúra; Súprava šnúr; Vrchná šnúra; Iné
el: Τύπος κορδονιών/πλέγματος λακρός: Κάτω κορδόνι (bottom string); Crosslace; Εργασία προσαρμοσμένου πλεξίματος; Κορδόνι τερματοφύλακα; Κιτ πλέγματος; Κομμάτι πλέγματος; Runner; Κορδόνι βολής (shooting string); Πλαϊνό κορδόνι (sidewall string); Κιτ κορδονιών; Πάνω κορδόνι (top string); Άλλο
de: Typ der Lacrosse-Bespannung: Bottom String; Crosslace; Individuelle Bespannung; Goalie-String; Mesh-Paket; Mesh-Stück; Runner; Shooting String; Sidewall String; String-Paket; Top String; Sonstige
it: Tipo di stringa per lacrosse: Corda inferiore; Laccio incrociato; Manodopera per incordatura personalizzata; Corda per portiere; Kit rete; Pezzo di rete; Runner; Corda di tiro; Corda laterale; Kit per incordatura; Corda superiore; Altro
cs: Typ lakrosového výpletu: Spodní lanko; Křížový výplet; Zakázkové vyplétání; Brankářský výplet; Sada síťoviny; Díl síťoviny; Středový výplet; Střelecké lanko; Boční lanko; Sada na výplet; Horní lanko; Jiné
nl: Lacrosse string type: Bodemkoord; Crosslace; Bespanning op maat; Goalie-koord; Meshkit; Meshstuk; Runner; Shooting string; Zijwandkoord; Koordkit; Bovenkoord; Overig
pl: Typ sznurka lacrosse: Sznurek dolny; Przeplotka; Niestandardowe przeplatanie; Sznurek bramkarski; Zestaw siatek; Element z siatki; Sznurek wzdłużny (runner); Sznurek rzutowy; Sznurek boczny; Zestaw sznurków; Sznurek górny; Inne
ro-RO: Tipul de coardă pentru stringing la lacrosse: Sfoară inferioară; Crosslace; Manoperă sfoară personalizată; Sfoară pentru portar; Kit de plasă; Bucată de plasă; Runner; Sfoară de aruncare; Sfoară laterală; Kit de sfoară; Sfoară superioară; Altele
hu: Lacrosse háló- és zsinórtípus: Alsó fűző; Keresztfűző; Egyedi fűzési munka; Kapusfűző; Hálókészlet; Hálódarab; Futószál; Dobófűző; Oldalfalfűző; Fűzőkészlet; Felső fűző; Egyéb
zh-TW: 長曲棍球線材類型: 底部綁繩; 交叉綁繩; 自訂穿線人工; 守門員綁繩; 網布工具包; 網片; 直拉繩; 射門繩; 側壁綁繩; 綁繩工具包; 頂部綁繩; 其他
pt-BR: Lacrosse cordão tipo: Corda inferior; Crosslace; Serviço de encordoamento personalizado; Corda de goleiro; Kit de malha; Peça de malha; Canal (runner); Corda de arremesso; Corda lateral; Kit de cordas; Corda superior; Outro
es: Tipo de cordaje de lacrosse: Cuerda inferior; Cuerda cruzada; Mano de obra de encordado personalizado; Cuerda de portero; Kit de malla; Pieza de malla; Runner; Cuerda de tiro; Cuerda lateral; Kit de cuerdas; Cuerda superior; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta Lacrosse strune: Donja uzica; Poprečna uzica; Prilagođena izrada uzica; Vratarska uzica; Komplet mreža; Dio mreže; Klizač; Uzica za bacanje; Bočna uzica; Komplet uzica; Gornja uzica; Ostalo
zh-CN: 袋棍球网线类型: 底线; 交叉线; 定制穿线服务; 守门员用线; 网兜套件; 网片; 滑条; 射门线; 侧壁线; 穿线套件; 顶线; 其他
ru: Тип шнуровки для лакросса: Нижний шнур; Поперечный шнур; Индивидуальная натяжка (работа); Вратарский шнур; Набор сеток; Кусок сетки; Центральная вставка; Бросковый шнур; Боковой шнур; Набор шнуров; Верхний шнур; Другое
fi: Lacrosse-verkkojousituksen narutyyppi: Alapunonta; Ristipunos; Mukautettu punontatyö; Maalivahdin punos; Verkkosarja; Verkko-osa; Kiskopunos; Heittopunos; Sivupunos; Punossarja; Yläpunos; Muu
fr: Type de cordage ou de maillage pour crosse: Cordon inférieur; Cordon transversal; Main-d’œuvre pour cordage personnalisé; Cordon de gardien; Kit de filet; Pièce de filet; Lanière; Cordon de tir; Cordon latéral; Kit de cordage; Cordon supérieur; Autre
ko: 라크로스 스트링 유형: 바텀 스트링; 크로스레이스; 맞춤형 스트링 작업; 골리 스트링; 메시 키트; 메시 피스; 러너; 슈팅 스트링; 사이드월 스트링; 스트링 키트; 탑 스트링; 기타
da: Typen af snøre i lacrosse-staven: Bundstreng; Crosslace; Specialtilpasset opstrengningsarbejde; Målmandsstreng; Netsæt; Netstykke; Runner; Shooting string; Sidewall string; Opstrengningssæt; Topstreng; Andet
ja: ラクロスストリングタイプ: ボトムストリング; クロスレース; カスタムストリンギング (人件費); ゴーリーストリング; メッシュキット; メッシュピース; ランナー; シューティングストリング; サイドウォールストリング; ストリングキット; トップストリング; その他
th: ลาครอส: สายด้านล่าง; สายเชือกไขว้; บริการขึ้นเอ็นตามสั่ง; สายสำหรับผู้รักษาประตู; ชุดตาข่าย; ชิ้นตาข่าย; เชือกกลางกระเป๋าตาข่าย (Runner); สายสำหรับยิง (Shooting string); สายยึดขอบด้านข้าง; ชุดสาย; สายด้านบน; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại dây Lacrosse: Dây dưới; Dây đan chéo; Gia công đan dây tùy chỉnh; Dây thủ môn; Bộ lưới; Miếng lưới; Dây đai dọc; Dây ném; Dây thành lưới; Bộ dây; Dây trên; Khác
bg-BG: Тип на връзките за лакрос крос: Долна връв; Напречна връв; Труд за персонализирано наплитане; Връв за вратар; Мрежест комплект; Мрежеста част; Водач; Връв за стрелба; Странична връв; Комплект за наплитане; Горна връв; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de corda de lacrosse: Fio inferior; Fio cruzado; Serviço de encordoamento personalizado; Fio de guarda-redes; Kit de rede; Peça de rede; Guia; Fio de lançamento; Fio lateral; Kit de fios; Fio superior; Outro
sv: Typ av lacrosse-sträng: Nedre snöre; Crosslace; Anpassat strängningsarbete; Målvaktssnöre; Nätkit; Nätdel; Runner; Shooting-snöre; Sidoväggssnöre; Snörkit; Övre snöre; Övrigt